Washington statutes.
RCW 26.20.071

Evidence—Spouse or domestic partner as witness.

In any proceedings relating to nonsupport or family desertion the laws attaching a privilege against the disclosure of communications between spouses or domestic partners shall be inapplicable and both spouses or domestic partners in such proceedings shall be competent witnesses to testify to any relevant matter, including marriage, domestic partnership, and parentage.

[ 2008 c 6 s 1041; 1963 c 10 s 1.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—Severability—2008 c 6: See RCW 26.60.900 and 26.60.901.

Uniform criminal extradition act: Chapter 10.88 RCW.